Illinois, session 104th, HB4603.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The sum of $50,000,000, or so much of that 5amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General 6Revenue Fund to the Illinois Housing Development Authority for 7the purpose of depositing into the First-Generation Homebuyer 8Down Payment Assistance Fund to provide down payments and 9closing costs assistance to eligible first-generation 10homebuyers, and other administrative expenses under the 11First-Generation Homebuyer Down Payment Assistance Program. 12    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 132026.